src/fst/affixes/regular_declinations.lexc
LEXICON ELANIK    ! VVS 25; (productive) i.e. stable type (aktiivne muuttüüp) 
                  ! almost == KABINET == TAUD

              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! elanik
                                          ! sg nom has a single final stop instead of double, 
                                          ! so it has to be doubled to get the forms right
              :%{dbl%}%>%{sg.u%} 1C_SG ;         ! elaniku etc
              :%{dbl%}%>e%{W%} N_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! NB! elanike etc
   +Usage/Rare:%{dbl%}%{sg.u%} DE_PL ;         ! elanikkude etc   
              :%{dbl%}%>%{pl.e%}%{sg.u%}%>%{s%}%{i%}%{d%} PL_PAR_VARIANT ;    ! elanikke; elanikkusid+Usage/Rare
              :%{dbl%} US_DERIVATION ;            ! õnnelikkus
              :%{dbl%}%>e%{W%}» IM_DERIVATION ;    ! õnnelikem
              :%>u%{W%} LIK_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON ÜMBRIK     ! VVS 2 & 25; (productive)
                   ! forms may be based on 2 productive, i.e. stable types (aktiivne muuttüüp)
                   ! if prononunced as both syllables stressed, then like ELANIK 
                   ! if prononunced as only first syllable stressed, then like VIRSIK (Usage/Rare)

              : ELANIK ;
     ! VIRSIK
   +Usage/Rare:%>u 2C_ADDED_TO_1C ;   ! VIRSIK
   +Usage/Rare:%>u»i IM_DERIVATION ;         ! ümbrikuim, ...

LEXICON ÄMBLIK     ! VVS 2 & 25; (productive) = ÜMBRIK, but the less used forms are incorrect according to lang. norm
                   ! forms may be based on 2 productive, i.e. stable types (aktiivne muuttüüp)
                   ! if prononunced as both syllables stressed, then like ELANIK 
                   ! if prononunced as only first syllable stressed, then like VIRSIK (Usage/NotNorm)

              : ELANIK ;
+Usage/NotNorm:%>u 2C_ADDED_TO_1C ;   ! VIRSIK
+Usage/NotNorm:%>u»i IM_DERIVATION ;         ! ämblikuim, ...

LEXICON ARMEE    ! VVS 26 ; (productive) i.e. stable type (aktiivne muuttüüp)

              : 1V ;
              : LIK_DERIVATION ;

! ---------------
! abbreviations
! ... inflect like any declinable
! ... declinational class depends on the pronunciation, but it is ignored here
! ... so the endings are often wrong...
! ---------------

LEXICON AbbrCases
              : # ;                         ! Wc ...
              : EndingsExpressingCase ;     ! Wc-sse, Wc-st, ...


! the endings that are attached via hyphen or apostrophe to a word, number, symbol, acronym
! it is a union of endings from all productive inflectional types
! used in guessing
LEXICON EndingsExpressingCase

              :d SG_PARTITIVE ;            ! KT-d
           +Sg: ALL_SEM_CASES ;            ! KT etc
           +Pl:d NOMINATIVE ;          ! KT-d
              :de N_PL_SUBPARA ;        ! KT-de etc  
              :sid PL_PARTITIVE ;     ! KT-sid

              :i N_SG_SUBPARA ;      ! KEKi etc
              :i SG_PARTITIVE ;               ! KEKi
              :i SG_ILLATIVE ;                ! KEKi
!    +Usage/Hyp:isse SG_ILLATIVE ;     ! KEKisse
              :ide N_PL_SUBPARA ;     ! KEKide etc
   +Usage/Rare:isid PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! KEKisid
              :e PL_PARTITIVE ;            ! KEKe

!              :t SG_PARTITIVE ;            ! NATOt   = ! ETISt
!           +Sg: ALL_SEM_CASES ;            ! NATO etc  = ! KT etc
!           +Pl:d NOMINATIVE ;            ! NATOd  = ! KT-d
!              :de N_PL_SUBPARA ;        ! NATO-de etc = ! KT-de etc 
!              :sid PL_PARTITIVE ;     ! NATO-sid = ! KT-sid

!              :i N_SG_SUBPARA ;      ! UNIXi etc  = ! KEKi etc
              :it SG_PARTITIVE ;               ! UNIXit
              :isse SG_ILLATIVE ;                ! UNIXisse
              :ite N_PL_SUBPARA ;     ! UNIXite etc
              :eid PL_PARTITIVE ;            ! UNIXeid

              :e N_SG_SUBPARA ;      ! ETISe etc
              :t SG_PARTITIVE ;               ! ETISt
              :esse SG_ILLATIVE ;     ! ETISesse
              :te N_PL_SUBPARA ;     ! ETISte etc
              :eid PL_PARTITIVE ;            ! ETISeid


! ---------------
! Symbol affixes
! ---------------

LEXICON Noun_symbols_possibly_inflected
     +N+Symbol: EndingsExpressingCase ;   ! has the same endings as abbreviations, sometimes wrong
                                          ! (e.g. Pl Gen €-te $-de instead of the correct €-de $-te)
     +N+Symbol: # ;

LEXICON Noun_symbols_never_inflected
     +N+Symbol: # ;

! ---------------
! Acronyms
! These should be really productive inflectional classes...
! They should not be different from the ones used for ordinary words
! ---------------

! inflecting acronyms: KEK-is, KEKis, KEK-IS are OK, but KEKIS is not
! to block optional capitalisation of the inflectional ending "-is" (written without "-"), 
! use the placeholder ^BlockCap which will be eliminated from the final net

LEXICON AcroArmee 
                 TypicalAcroArmee ;
       ^BlockCap Acro1V ;
            
LEXICON TypicalAcroArmee
           +Sg: NOMINATIVE ;
           +Sg: GENITIVE ;
              :- Acro1V ;
              
LEXICON Acro1V 
              :d SG_PARTITIVE ;            ! KT-d
           +Sg: ALL_SEM_CASES ;            ! KT etc
           +Pl:d NOMINATIVE ;          ! KT-d
              :de N_PL_SUBPARA ;        ! KT-de etc  
              :sid PL_PARTITIVE ;     ! KT-sid

LEXICON AcroFiat 
                 TypicalAcroFiat ;
       ^BlockCap Acro1C ;

LEXICON TypicalAcroFiat
           +Sg: NOMINATIVE ;
              :- Acro1C ;

LEXICON Acro1C 
              :i N_SG_SUBPARA ;      ! KEKi etc
              :i SG_PARTITIVE ;               ! KEKi
              :i SG_ILLATIVE ;                ! KEKi
    +Usage/Hyp:isse SG_ILLATIVE ;     ! KEKisse
              :ide N_PL_SUBPARA ;     ! KEKide etc
   +Usage/Rare:isid PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! KEKisid
              :e PL_PARTITIVE ;            ! KEKe


LEXICON AcroPere 
                 TypicalAcroPere ;
       ^BlockCap Acro2V ;

LEXICON TypicalAcroPere
           +Sg: NOMINATIVE ;
           +Sg: GENITIVE ;
              :- Acro2V ;

LEXICON Acro2V 
              :t SG_PARTITIVE ;            ! NATOt
           +Sg: ALL_SEM_CASES ;            ! NATO etc
           +Pl:d NOMINATIVE ;            ! NATOd
              :de N_PL_SUBPARA ;        ! NATO-de etc  
              :sid PL_PARTITIVE ;     ! NATO-sid

LEXICON AcroRedel 
                 TypicalAcroRedel ;
       ^BlockCap Acro2C ;

LEXICON TypicalAcroRedel
           +Sg: NOMINATIVE ;
              :- Acro2C ;

LEXICON Acro2C 
              :i N_SG_SUBPARA ;      ! UNIXi etc
              :it SG_PARTITIVE ;               ! UNIXit
              :isse SG_ILLATIVE ;                ! UNIXisse
              :ite N_PL_SUBPARA ;     ! UNIXite etc
              :eid PL_PARTITIVE ;            ! UNIXeid


LEXICON AcroEtis 
                 TypicalAcroEtis ;
       ^BlockCap AcroS ;

LEXICON TypicalAcroEtis
           +Sg: NOMINATIVE ;
              :- AcroS ;

LEXICON AcroS 
              :e N_SG_SUBPARA ;      ! ETISe etc
              :t SG_PARTITIVE ;               ! ETISt
              :esse SG_ILLATIVE ;     ! ETISesse
              :te N_PL_SUBPARA ;     ! ETISte etc
              :eid PL_PARTITIVE ;            ! ETISeid

! ---------------
! numbers
! ---------------

! 10st, 10line, 10 000-st, 2,5-line, 10 000%st, 10''line, 1'-st
LEXICON CardinalWithStandardEnding

     +Num+Card: # ;
  +Num+Card+Sg: ALL_SEM_CASES ;
  +Num+Card+Sg:- ALL_SEM_CASES ;
     +Num+Card: LINE_DERIVATION ;
     +Num+Card:- LINE_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON CardinalWithOrdinalEnding

      +Num+Ord:nda 2C ;
      +Num+Ord:-nda 2C ;

LEXICON CardinalWithFractionEnding

     +Num+Card:ndik ELANIK ;
     +Num+Card:-ndik ELANIK ;

LEXICON CardinalNoEnd
     +Num+Card: # ;

LEXICON OrdinalNoEnd
     +Num+Ord: # ;      ! IV, MCM

LEXICON OrdinalDotEnd
      +Num+Ord: DOT ;


! ---------------
! sub-paradigms common to several inflectional types
! ---------------

LEXICON NE_S_COMMON ! VVS 9, 10, 11, 12 common forms for affix -ne, -line, -s, -tus etc 

              :E1 N_SG_SUBPARA ;                
              :E1%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;         ! soolast, raudset, olulist
              :E1 TE_PL ;        
              :E1 US_DERIVATION ;
              :E1 SHORT_NE_STEM ;           ! nais-, vaatamis-, astraal-

LEXICON LINE_US_SPECIFIC   ! -line, -us ending words
              : LINE_US_NORM ;
              : LINE_US_RARE ;

LEXICON LINE_US_RARE  ! part of line_us_specific

   +Usage/Rare:E1%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;          ! olulisesse, harjutusesse
   +Usage/Rare:%>I1 N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;   ! olulisil, harjutusil etc

LEXICON LINE_US_NORM  ! part of line_us_specific

              :E1%>se SG_ILLATIVE ;           ! olulisse, harjutusse (haplology)
              :%>I1 PL_PARTITIVE ;            ! olulisi, harjutusi
              :»I1 IM_DERIVATION ;           ! olulisim
      
! ------

LEXICON 1C    ! consonant ending, stress NOT on penultimate syllable

                           ! NOMINATIVE is without stem vowel
              : 1C_SG ;    ! singular forms + pl nom
              :%>%{s%}%{i%}%{d%} PL_PAR_VARIANT ;   ! kingi, kingasid+Usage/Rare vs. puudi+Usage/Rare,
                                                    ! puudasid; kavu, kavasid; sõdu, sõdasid
              : DE_PL ;

LEXICON 1V    ! vowel ending, stress on the last syllable

              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! armee
              : N_SG_SUBPARA ;            ! armee etc
              :%>d SG_PARTITIVE ;            ! armeed
              :{S%} SG_ILL_VARIANT ;       ! öhe
              : SG_ILL_VARIANT ;           ! öösse 
              :%>%{s%}id PL_PAR_VARIANT ; ! armeesid; armeid...
              : DE_PL ;                   ! armeede etc  

LEXICON 2C    ! stress on penultimate syllable & word ends with a consonant; 
              ! or stressed penult. syllable extra heavy (e.g. -aania)  

                                          ! NOMINATIVE is without stem vowel; may be in weak grade
              :%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;            ! redelit, virsikut; may be in weak grade 
              : 2C_STRONG ;             ! redeleid, redeleil etc
              : TE_PL ;                 ! redelite, asemete, haarmete; may be in weak grade

LEXICON 2C_STRONG    ! if the word has (strengthening) gradation, then these forms are in non-weak grade 

              : N_SG_SUBPARA ;             ! redeli, kotka etc
              : SG_ILL_VARIANT ;           ! taskusse or tasku
              :%>id PL_PARTITIVE ;            ! kotkaid
   +Usage/Rare:%>i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! kotkail etc
              :»i IM_DERIVATION ;         ! magusaim, rentaableim, ...

LEXICON 1C_SG    ! SG subpara of 1C

              :%{W%} N_SG_SUBPARA ;    ! koti etc
              : SG_PARTITIVE ;            ! kotti
              : SG_ILLATIVE ;              ! kotti
    +Usage/Hyp:%{W%}%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! kotisse is very rare

LEXICON DE_PL    ! PL subpara of 1C, 1V, KAVA, PERE, ...

              :%>de N_PL_SUBPARA ;     ! kottide etc

LEXICON TE_PL    ! PL subpara of 2C, ...

              :%>te N_PL_SUBPARA ;     ! redelite etc

LEXICON 2C_ADDED_TO_1C  ! if a word inflects both like 1C and 2C, then it has these forms in addition to 1C

              :%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;            ! muuseumit, ämblikut 
              :%>id PL_PARTITIVE ;            ! muuseumeid, ämblikuid
              : TE_PL ;                 ! muuseumite, ämblikute
   +Usage/Rare:%>i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! muuseumeil, ämblikuil

! ---------------
! rules of analogy
! (cases grouped in various ways, for combining in different paradigms)
! ---------------

LEXICON N_SG_SUBPARA    ! sg gen + sg cases depending on it + pl nom; excl sg ill

              : SG_GENITIVE ; 
           +Sg: REGULAR_LOCATIVES ;
           +Sg:%>ks TRANSLATIVE ;
           +Sg: NINATAGA ;
       +Pl+Nom:%>d PL_NOM_GI ;

LEXICON N_PL_SUBPARA    ! pl gen + pl cases depending on it 

           +Pl: STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL ;
